Utah statutes.
77-23a-6.   Seizure and forfeiture of intercepting devices.

Any electronic, mechanical or other device used, sent, carried, manufactured, assembled, possessed, sold, or advertised in violation of Sections 77-23a-4 and 77-23a-5, may be seized and forfeited to the State of Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

